Massachusetts, session 194th, S2617.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the city of
Worcester may adopt local general or zoning ordinances to promote and facilitate the
development of large- scale institutional facilities in the city of Worcester. The legislation
authorizes the city of Worcester to require the adoption of an Institutional Master Plan as
described below in Section 2. An Institutional Master Plan is a land-use and development plan
for land owned or used by an institution within a community, that identifies existing and future
growth and development of the institution. The master plan enables the community to ensure
development impacts are addressed through the public review and adoption of the master plan.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding G. L. c. VA, § 3 or any general or special law to the
contrary, the city of Worcester may adopt a general or zoning ordinance imposing Institutional
Master Plan review to regulate the use of land or structures for land owned, leased, or otherwise
of 2

occupied by institutions such as hospitals, health care institutions, colleges, universities, and non-
profit educational corporations. In the event the city of Worcester authorizes such a use by
special permit, it may provide that such special permits shall expire and be renewed after 10
years and may also require that any such institution in existence at the time of such adoption
shall be required to apply for such special permit within 120 days of the adoption of the local
zoning ordinance.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 2